Idaho, session 2025, S1016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 25-1121, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-1121. REQUIREMENTS FOR BRAND INSPECTION -- WRITTEN PERMIT IN LIEU
OF INSPECTION. (1) Any person desiring to transport, remove, or drive any
livestock from the boundaries of this state in any manner shall, before do-
ing so, apply to the state brand inspector to inspect the same for marks and
brands, and on such application (or without said application if said offi-
cer has knowledge of such removal) the brand inspector shall immediately in-
spect said livestock for brands and marks and keep an accurate record of the
same with the name and residence of owner or shipper and name, sex and kind
of livestock. Any person desiring an inspection pursuant to this paragraph
must notify a state brand inspector or person duly authorized to accomplish
the inspection. If the inspector finds that the livestock have brands that
are not owned by the person claiming the same, then such person shall be re-
quired to produce a bill of sale or other satisfactory evidence of owner-
ship. Upon proof of ownership the inspector shall give the person a cer-
tificate stating the number and kind of livestock and their marks and brands
and thereupon the said person shall be permitted to transport said livestock
from this state. A copy of the brand inspection certificate shall accompany
the livestock to final destination.
(2) Any person desiring to transport livestock, not his own, within the
boundaries of this state in any manner shall before doing so, have in his pos-
session a written transportation permit properly completed and signed by the
owner or an authorized agent of the owner of the livestock being transported


or a brand inspection certificate. A copy of the written permit or brand in-
spection certificate shall accompany the livestock to final destination.
(3) Annual brand inspections certificates for all livestock for any
purpose, other than sale or trade, may be issued by the state brand inspector
or his deputies in lieu of the regularly required brand inspection or other
written permits for periods of not to exceed one (1) year in duration and for
a fee of not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) ten dollars ($10.00), each as
determined by regulation of the state brand board.
(4) The owner of the livestock shall pay all fees required for inspec-
tion services pursuant to this chapter, section 25-232, Idaho Code, section
25-2505, Idaho Code, and section 25-2907, Idaho Code.
(5) Any transportation of livestock in violation of this chapter is
prohibited. Livestock transported in violation of this chapter shall be
detained until compliance with this chapter has been made.
SECTION 2. That Section 25-1144, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-1144. MANNER OF RECORDING BRANDS. Every stock grower whose brands
are not recorded, desiring to use any brand on any livestock shall make and
file an application setting forth a facsimile and description of the brand
which that he desires to use, which application shall state the post-office
address and county of his residence, and he shall file such application with
the state brand inspector and the same shall be recorded in a book kept for
that purpose, by the state brand inspector and from. From and after the fil-
ing of such application, the stock grower filing the same, shall have the ex-
clusive right to use such brand, within the state of Idaho. Such recording
shall be valid for a period of not more than five (5) years, as determined
by rules of the state brand board, subject to the renewal provisions of sec-
tion 25-1145, Idaho Code. Such person, upon the filing of the brand, shall
pay to the state brand inspector for recording the brand the sum of fifty dol-
lars ($50.00) seventy-five dollars ($75.00) and the board may prorate the
fee to facilitate implementation of a staggered brand renewal system. It
shall be the duty of the state brand inspector to furnish without further or
other charge, one (1) certified copy of the application to the owner thereof
upon his request, and for each additional copy he shall be paid a reason-
able fee as determined by the state brand board not to exceed one dollar and
fifty cents ($1.50) for the additional certified copies: provided, further,
that the a fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be assessed. The state brand in-
spector shall not file or record any such brand if the same has already been
filed or recorded by him in favor of some other stock grower. The certified
copy of the application shall contain the registration number of such brand,
description or facsimile copy of the recorded brand, location of brand on
the animal, expiration of the recorded brand and the name and address of the
owner of the recorded brand. Upon a request to research a brand recording, a
fee of thirty-six dollars ($36.00) per hour spent shall be paid to the state
brand inspector.
SECTION 3. That Section 25-1145, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


25-1145. RENEWAL OF BRANDS. (1) On July 1, 2011, and at the end of each
recording period of an original application pursuant to section 25-1144,
Idaho Code, and at the end of each successive period thereafter on the first
day of July, the recording of every brand in the office of the state brand
inspector shall be renewed upon application for such renewal by the owner.
The fee of the state brand inspector for filing each such renewal application
shall be not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) two hundred
dollars ($200), twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of which shall be considered
a wolf control assessment pursuant to section 22-5306, Idaho Code, and it.
It shall be the duty of the state brand inspector to furnish without further
or other charge one (1) certified copy of the certificate of such brand to
the owner thereof upon his request, and for each additional certified copy
the state brand inspector shall be paid a reasonable fee as determined by the
state brand board not to exceed one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for the ad-
ditional certified copy five dollars ($5.00). The fee for recording each re-
newal shall be paid coincident with the filing of the application therefor.
(2) Each application for the renewal and the record of renewal of each
brand shall be made in the same manner as is provided by law for the filing of
an original application for the recording of a brand.
(3) If an application for the renewal of any brand shall not be made and
the fee therefor paid within the period of six (6) months after the expira-
tion date for such renewal, then such brand may be allotted by the state brand
inspector to any other person who shall apply therefor.
SECTION 4. That Section 25-1146, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-1146. SALES AND TRANSFERS OF BRANDS. Any brand recorded in accor-
dance with the requirements of this chapter shall be the property of the
stock grower in whose name the same shall be recorded, and shall be subject
to sale, assignment, transfer, devise and descent, the same as personal
property. Instruments of writing evidencing any such sale, assignment or
transfer shall be acknowledged as deeds to real estate are now required to
be, and shall be recorded in the office of the state brand inspector in a book
to be by said officer kept for that purpose, which shall be properly indexed.
The recording of such instruments in said office shall have the same force
and effect as to third parties, as the recording of instruments affecting
real estate, and the acknowledgment of the same shall have the same force and
effect as the acknowledgment of deeds to real estate, and certified copies of
the record of any such instrument, duly acknowledged, may be introduced in
evidence the same as is now provided for certified copies of instruments af-
fecting real estate. The fee of the state brand inspector for recording the
writings evidencing each such sale, assignment or transfer shall be fifty
dollars ($50.00) seventy-five dollars ($75.00).
SECTION 5. That Section 25-1160, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-1160. BRAND INSPECTION FEES. (1) The maximum fee which that shall
be charged by the state brand inspector and his deputies for brand inspection
shall be:


(a) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) fifty cents ($1.50) for
each head of cattle;
(b) Ten dollars ($10.00) for each head of horses, mules, and asses.
(2) A The minimum fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be charged by
the state brand inspector and his deputies that shall be charged by the state
brand inspector for brand inspection shall be:
(a) An amount set by the state brand board, not to exceed forty dol-
lars ($40.00), for each brand inspection certificate issued, whether
for cattle, horses, mules, or asses, or a combination thereof. The min-
imum brand inspection fee shall apply only in those cases when a brand
inspector must travel from his assigned duty post.
(b) There shall be an equine farm service fee in an amount to be set by
the state brand board, not to exceed fifty-five dollars ($55.00), for
each case a brand inspector must travel from his assigned duty post to
complete a brand inspection certificate for horses, mules, or asses,
which fee shall be in addition to any brand inspection certificate or
other written permit requested by the owner or owners of a horse, mule,
or ass under any other provisions of law. Livestock auctions and feed-
lots currently approved by the Idaho state department of agriculture
are exempt from the equine farm service fee.
(3) The minimum fee for brand inspection services at any normally
scheduled livestock auction sale is fifty dollars ($50.00) one hundred dol-
lars ($100) per day and shall be paid by the livestock auction sale, whether
or not the inspection fee received from the owners of livestock inspected
equals the minimum fee. If the fees paid by the owners of livestock inspected
at the sale exceed the minimum fee, the actual amount of fees collected shall
be paid, rather than the minimum amount.
(4) The fee for brand inspection services at any livestock auction sale
that is not a normally scheduled livestock auction sale shall be:
(a) Eighteen dollars ($18.00) Thirty-six dollars ($36.00) per hour for
each hour that each brand inspector spends engaged in the performance of
brand inspection services at the livestock auction sale;
(b) A mileage rate as established by the state board of examiners per
mile per vehicle for each mile that said brand inspector(s) must travel
to and from the sale from his assigned duty post.
The minimum fee, not including mileage, shall be the actual hours worked, or
thirty-six dollars ($36.00) seventy-two dollars ($72.00) per day, or the in-
spection fees as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, whichever is
greater.
(5) The state brand board may adopt a schedule or schedules of fees that
are below the maximum fees and may thereafter review and adjust such schedule
or schedules from time to time whenever such board finds that fees annually
at a regular and properly noticed meeting of the board held in the first cal-
endar quarter, with said fees to be scheduled in an amount reasonably neces-
sary to cover the cost of administering and enforcing the laws of the state
of Idaho for brand inspection of livestock can be maintained with such be-
low-maximum fees. The state brand board shall only adjust the fees to be
collected under this section for this purpose alone, and in no event shall
the fee for cattle brand inspections increase more than ten cents ($0.10) per
head annually, while remaining below the maximum fees allowed by law. If the


board determines fee adjustments are necessary, such adjustments shall take
effect on July 1 of the same year, and notice of any fee increases shall be
posted prominently on the front page of the brand inspector's website. All
such fees shall be paid by the owner of the cattle, horses, mules, and asses
and credited to the state brand account.
(6) All brand inspection fees, and all other fees required by law to be
collected by the brand inspector, are due and payable at the time of inspec-
tion, but the brand board may, by rule, allow all of such fees to be paid on
a schedule that requires payment at least monthly, after receiving a request
for such delayed payment schedule and after such request is approved by the
state brand inspector. The brand board may require a security deposit to en-
sure the prompt payment of all fees owed to the state. Failure to pay as re-
quired shall be cause for the brand inspector to file an action in the dis-
trict court of the county wherein the inspection was made for the amount of
all fees owed, plus all costs and reasonable attorney's fees associated with
the action plus interest at the rate specified in section 28-22-104, Idaho
Code, on the amount owed from the due date.
(7) Any brand inspector who must travel beyond the border of the state
of Idaho to investigate a possible violation of this chapter is entitled to
a mileage rate, as established by the state board of examiners, per mile per
vehicle for each mile that the brand inspector must travel to and from his as-
signed duty post, and eighteen dollars ($18.00) thirty-six dollars ($36.00)
per hour for each hour that each brand inspector spends engaged in the inves-
tigation. The minimum fee for each brand inspector, not including mileage,
shall be the actual hours worked, or thirty-six dollars ($36.00) seventy-
two dollars ($72.00) per day, or the hourly inspection fees, whichever is
greater.
(8) A fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be paid to the state brand in-
spector for each duplicate brand inspection certificate issued.
SECTION 6. That Section 25-1161, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-1161. FEES -- STATE BRAND ACCOUNT. All fees of every kind collected
by the office of the state brand inspector or under any rules or regulations
made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter 11, title 25, Idaho Code,
shall be deposited in a separate dedicated account in the state treasury and
kept in a special and separate account in the dedicated fund to be known as
the "state brand account"; said account is hereby known as the "state brand
account." The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the state brand
account, and the interest earned shall be retained in said account. All such
moneys in said account are hereby continuously appropriated for the use and
expenditure of said board in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and
in the performance of all of its duties and the duties of the state brand in-
spector and in carrying out the rules and regulations which that shall be
made by the board, and for salaries and wages and other expenses of the of-
fice of the state brand inspector, the state brand board, and its employees
for the purpose of fulfilling the duties of such office, and said account is
hereby declared to be a continuing account.


SECTION 7. That Section 25-3303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-3303. LICENSE REQUIRED. Any person doing business as a livestock
dealer in the state of Idaho must secure an annual license from the board. A
fee of one hundred dollars ($100) three hundred dollars ($300) shall accom-
pany any such application for initial issuance or renewal. In addition, a
fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) one hundred dollars ($100) shall be paid
for each authorized representative of a licensee. Such fees so received are
not returnable and shall be deposited in the state brand account created in
section 25-1161, Idaho Code. Upon determination that the applicant is qual-
ified, the board shall issue a license to the applicant and all annual li-
censes shall terminate and become void each successive June 30th.
SECTION 8. The rules contained in IDAPA 11.02.01, Idaho State Police,
relating to Rules of the Idaho State Brand Board, Section 34., Subsection
01.; and Section 100., Subsections 02. and 03., shall be null, void, and of
no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.